Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1846
Real property taxes; treasurer's tax deed; effect of fraud.

In all cases when the owner of real property sold for taxes resists the validity of a tax title, the owner may prove fraud committed by the officer selling the same or in the purchaser to defeat the same, and if fraud is so established, the sale and title shall be void.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 221, p. 471;

R.S.1913, § 6549;

C.S.1922, § 6077;

C.S.1929, § 77-2029;

R.S.1943, § 77-1846;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 164;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 137.